Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 9 Economic Development Loan Program

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 232, § 1(b), effective July 1, 1991, repealed this chapter.

Laws 1991, ch. 151, § 2, repealed Laws 1989, ch. 232, § 1(b).

§§ 9-9-101 through 9-9-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 151, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 219, § 1, related to the economic development loan program.

Laws 1995, ch. 199, § 1, purported to amend § 9-9-107. However, Laws 1991, ch. 151, § 1, repealed §§

9-9-101

through 9-9-108 effective July 1, 1995 and therefore the 1995 amendment was not given effect.

§ 9-9-109.
Termination of board. [Expired]

W.S.

9-9-101

through 9-9-108 are repealed effective July 1, 1995.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 151, § 1.